New Jersey, session 222, S1390.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Director of the Division of Highway Traffic Safety in the Department of Law and Public Safety shall establish a public awareness campaign to provide information to the public concerning bicyclist and pedestrian safety including, but not limited to, information regarding the provisions of section 17 of P.L.1951, c.23 (C.39:4-14.2), the penalties and dangers associated with violating this provision, information regarding the provisions of section 1 of P.L.2021, c.194 (C.39:4-92.4) concerning motorists safely passing a pedestrian, bicycle, low-speed electric bicycle, low-speed electric scooter, or any other lawful personal conveyance, and the penalties and dangers associated with violating this provision. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.